California statutes. Insurance Code
(l) Membership interests in a mutual holding company are exempt from Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. A description of the membership interests and related factual disclosure shall not be considered to be an inducement to buy insurance in violation of Section 10430. Any promise of returns, profits, or distributions, or representations with regard to the benefits of membership, made as an inducement in connection with the issuance and delivery of a policy is subject to Section 10430 and the remedy provided in Section 10433.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.13.

(a) Prior to, and for a period of five years following, the effective date of the plan of conversion, no person or group of persons acting in concert shall directly or indirectly offer to acquire or acquire in any manner the beneficial ownership of 5 percent or more of any class of voting securities of a converted insurer or of a person that controls, as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 1215, the converted insurer, without the prior consent of the commissioner. Any application for that approval shall contain information as the commissioner may require and shall be accompanied by a filing fee in an amount equal to the filing fee specified in Section 1215.2.

(b) In the event of any violation of this section, or of any
 action that, if consummated, would constitute a violation, all voting securities of the converted insurer or of the person acquired by any person in excess of the maximum amount permitted to be acquired by the person pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be nonvoting securities of the converted insurer or of that person. The violation or action may be enforced or enjoined by an appropriate proceeding commenced by the converted insurer, a person, the commissioner, any policyholder or stockholder of the converted insurer, or the person on behalf of the converted insurer or the person in the superior court in the judicial district in which the converted insurer has its home office or in any other court having jurisdiction. The court may issue any order it finds necessary to cure the violation or to prevent the proposed action. In addition to the foregoing, whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of this section, the commissioner may proceed as provided in
 Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 to take possession of the property of the converted insurer and to conduct the business thereof.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “beneficial ownership,” with respect to voting securities, means the sole or shared power to vote, or direct the voting of, voting securities or the sole or shared power to dispose, or direct the disposition, of voting securities.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “voting security” includes voting stock as defined in Section 4097.01, any preorganization certificate or subscription, including subscription rights issued pursuant to a plan of conversion, or any security convertible, with or without consideration, into voting security, or carrying any warrant or right to subscribe for, or purchase any, voting security, or any such warrant or right.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “offer” includes an offer to buy or acquire, solicitation of an offer to sell, tender offer for, or request or invitation for tenders of a security or interest in a security for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 22.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.14.

Unless otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the directors and officers of the mutual company shall serve as directors and officers of the converted company until new directors and officers have been duly elected and qualified pursuant to the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the stock company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.15.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), actions concerning any plan of conversion, proposed plan of conversion, plan amendment, or proposed plan amendment under this article or any acts taken or proposed to be taken under this article shall be commenced within one year after the plan of conversion or plan amendment is filed in the office of the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4097.02 or subdivision (a) of Section 4098.1, or six months from the effective date of the plan of conversion, whichever is later. If the plan of conversion is withdrawn, the actions or acts shall be commenced within six months from the date the board of directors approves a resolution to withdraw the plan. If an action concerns or arises out of a plan amendment or proposed plan amendment made under Section 4097.18, the applicable time period is measured from the filing, effective date, or approval of withdrawal of the plan amendment, whichever is later.

(b) Judicial review of any act of the commissioner or any other governmental body or officer concerning or arising out of any plan of conversion, proposed plan of conversion, plan amendment, or proposed plan amendment under this article may only be had by filing a petition for a writ of mandate within 30 days of the date of the act. However, any petition seeking judicial review shall be filed no later than 30 days from the effective date of the plan of conversion or plan amendment, whichever is the subject of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.16.

The offer or sale of securities, including any debt securities, issued pursuant to the plan of conversion developed and approved in accordance with the provisions of this article, shall be exempt from Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.17.

The commissioner shall have the authority from time to time, to make, amend, and rescind any rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. The commissioner shall also have the authority to charge and collect from the insurer for the actual amount of expenses reasonably incurred by the state in discharge of the commissioner’s duties hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.18.

Upon completion of the act of conversion and issuance of the certificate of authority under Section 4097.11, the Secretary of State shall accept for filing a verified copy of the amended articles of incorporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.19.

(a) The amended articles of incorporation of a converted company that have been adopted pursuant to a plan of conversion and filed with the Secretary of State in accordance with Section 4097.11 may be further amended after the effective date pursuant to applicable law. The plan of conversion may be amended in other respects after the effective date of the plan as specified in this section. The amendment shall take effect upon filing with the Secretary of State after compliance with the following:

(1) Approval by a resolution of at least two-thirds of the board of directors of the converted company. The resolution shall specify the reasons for and the purposes of the proposed amendment.

(2) Submission to the commissioner for consent in writing, subject to the provisions of Section 4097.06.

(3) For the conversion of a mutual insurer, approval by at least two-thirds of those current policyholders of the corporation who were members of the former mutual insurer and were entitled to vote on the original plan of conversion approved pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4097.02 and who vote at a meeting called for that purpose.

(4) For the demutualization of a mutual holding company, approval by at least two-thirds of those current members of the corporation who were members of the former mutual holding company and were entitled to vote on the original plan of conversion approved pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4097.02 and who vote at a meeting called for that purpose.

(5) Filed in the office of the commissioner after having been consented to and approved as contemplated by paragraphs (2), (3), and (4).

(b) If an amendment proposed under subdivision (a) would adversely affect the rights of one or more classes of members, but not all those members, then only the members of each class whose rights would be adversely affected by the proposed amendment are entitled to vote on the proposed plan amendment.

(c) A policyholder or member meeting prescribed by paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) shall be called by the board of directors, the chairperson of the board, or the president of the converted company. Notice of the meeting shall be given to policyholders or members entitled to vote at the meeting by mail at least 45 days prior to the date set for the meeting. Voting shall be by ballot, in person, or by proxy. A quorum consists of 10 percent of the policyholders or members of the converted company entitled to vote at the meeting.

(d) At any time before the plan amendment becomes effective, the converted company may, by resolution of two-thirds of the board of directors, amend the plan amendment or withdraw its plan amendment. For an amendment to a plan amendment, all references in this section to the plan amendment shall be deemed to refer to the plan amendment as amended. Any amendment of the plan amendment shall require the written consent of the commissioner. No amendment shall be deemed to change the date of adoption of the plan amendment. No amendment made after approval by the policyholders or members as provided in paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) may change the plan amendment in a manner that the commissioner determines is materially disadvantageous to any of the affected policyholders or members unless the plan amendment as amended is submitted for reconsideration under the procedures prescribed for the original plan amendment policyholder or member approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.20.

If the name of a mutual insurer converting to a stock insurer pursuant to this article includes the word “mutual,” the new stock insurer may continue to use the word “mutual” in its name if the name includes a word or words that identify the new stock insurer as a stock insurer and the commissioner finds that the continued use of the word “mutual” in its name is not likely to mislead or deceive the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. County Mutual Fire Insurers [5050. - 7060.]



  ARTICLE 1. Formation and Organization [5050. - 5063.]

5050.

Two hundred fifty (250) or more persons residing in one county of this State may incorporate for the purpose of forming a mutual fire insurer upon all such persons agreeing to:

(a) Secure fire insurance from such insurer when organized through policies to be issued by such insurer having face amounts aggregating one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) or more covering their property of the same or greater value. Such insurer shall retain net of reinsurance aggregate amounts on such policies at least equal to such amount.

(b) Pay the premium for such insurance immediately upon notification by such insurer that it is prepared to issue such policies providing such insurance.

(c) Pay to the insurer immediately upon its incorporation a special deposit of at least one dollar ($1) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of insurance applied for under (a) above, such special deposit to be applied to future premiums payable by such persons either after the expiration of three years or upon the commissioner determining that the insurer has a surplus earned by insurance operations in the amount of at least fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), whichever occurs first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

5050.1.

If such persons have not performed all acts and secured all agreements necessary to complete the incorporation of such insurer within one year from the date of their first securing an agreement from any person, all proceedings and agreements in connection with such incorporation shall become null and void and all persons entering into such agreements shall be released therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

5050.5.

Any county mutual fire insurer heretofore or hereafter incorporated and doing business under the provisions of this chapter may, if it has issued an insurance policy against fire, and as long as it maintains an excess of admitted assets over liabilities of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), endorse such policy to extend the coverage thereof to include insurance of the kinds included in Sections 107, 112, 120 and 122 (excluding liability insurance).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 473.)
-------------------------------------------

5051.

Upon the payment in advance of seven thousand fifty-five dollars ($7,055) to the commissioner for all services to be rendered by him or her in the matter of organization of the insurer, those persons shall file with the commissioner a declaration of their intention to incorporate for the purposes expressed in Section 5050. The declaration shall be signed by all of those persons, and shall contain a copy of the articles of incorporation proposed to be adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 54.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5052.

The commissioner shall examine the proposed articles of incorporation. If they conform to this chapter he shall deliver to such persons a certificate permitting them to incorporate such insurer. The certificate shall be directed to the clerk of the county in which such insurer is proposed to be organized and shall contain a copy of the proposed articles of incorporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5053.

The duly executed articles of incorporation and a copy of the certificate of the commissioner shall be filed with the Secretary of State in conformity with Section 200 of the Corporations Code. Upon organizing under the articles of incorporation and obtaining from the commissioner a certificate of authority, the county mutual fire insurer may carry on a fire insurance business as provided by this chapter. The term and nature of the certificate of authority, annual renewal fee therefor, the due date and delinquent date of the fee shall be the same as prescribed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 699) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 for stock and mutual insurers governed by that article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5054.

The articles of incorporation and certificate obtained by any county mutual fire insurer operating under the provisions of this chapter are subject to control and modification by the Legislature of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5055.

The by-laws and all amendments thereto shall be filed with the commissioner within sixty days after their adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5056.

Such insurer shall have not less than seven, nor more than 11 directors, a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum to do business.

The by-laws or the articles may provide or be amended to provide for either concurrent terms of one year for all directors or staggered terms of not more than five years. If provision is made for staggered terms, such terms shall, except for the first directors elected for staggered terms, be uniform for all directors and so arranged that as nearly equal a number of directors as is feasible shall be elected each year.

The directors shall be elected by ballot from the members of the insurer. They shall hold office for the terms for which they were elected, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

5057.

The annual meeting of the members of the insurer shall be held on the second Monday of February of each year, unless its board of directors fixes the time for the annual meeting in which event the board may select any day between the second and third Mondays of February.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.

In the election of the first board of directors each member shall be entitled to one vote. At every subsequent election each member shall be entitled to as many votes as there are directors to be elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

5059.

A member may cast his votes in person or by proxy, distributing them among the directors to be elected, or among a less number of the directors, or cumulating them upon one candidate, as he sees fit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5060.

The directors shall elect, from their own number, a president and a vice president. They shall also elect a treasurer and a secretary, who need not be members of the insurer nor natural persons. All of such officers hold their office for one year from the date of their election, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5061.

The treasurer and secretary shall give bonds to the insurer for the faithful performance of their duties, in such amounts as are prescribed by the board of directors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.

No incorporators or persons acting in their behalf or other persons participating in the management of such insurer shall advance to or for the subscribers or members any premium, special deposit or assessment required to be paid. It is the intent of this chapter that no person shall have a proprietary interest in such insurer, except equally with all other members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.

No such insurer may enter into any general agency or management contract whereby it authorizes or delegates to a person the right to assume virtual control of its operations or of the production of business for it in this State or any specified portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers [5080. - 5081.]

5080.

Such insurer and its directors possess the usual powers, and are subject to the usual duties of corporations and directors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5081.

Such insurer may accumulate such surplus as its directors deem desirable for meeting contingencies, to cover the catastrophe hazard, and for general corporate purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 96.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Membership [5090. - 5094.]

5090.

Any person having an insurable interest in property in the county in which any such insurer is formed or any person having such an interest in property in any adjoining county may become a member by insuring therein. Every member shall be entitled to all the rights and privileges appertaining to membership, except that at least a majority of the directors shall reside either in the county in which the insurer is formed or in any of the counties which were the original domicile of any of the constituent companies of a county mutual merged under Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 7040) of this chapter, and not more than one member from each of the adjoining counties in which it transacts insurance may become one of its directors. Whenever any public or private corporation, board or association in this State has entered into an agreement for and holds a policy in any county mutual insurer operating under this chapter, any officer, stockholder or trustee of any such corporation, board or association may be recognized as acting for or on its behalf for the purpose of such membership, but shall not be personally liable upon such contract of insurance by reason of acting in such representative capacity. The right of any corporation organized under the laws of this State to participate as a member of such county mutual insurer is hereby declared to be incidental to the purpose for which such corporation is organized and as much granted as the rights and powers expressly conferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1470.)
-------------------------------------------

5090.2.

Not more than one person licensed as an insurance agent, broker or solicitor, or who is a member of an association or partnership or a stockholder or employee of a corporation which is so licensed is eligible to be a director of a county mutual insurer. If a director of the board is licensed as an insurance agent, broker or solicitor, or is a member of an association or partnership or a stockholder or employee of a corporation which is so licensed, neither he nor the association, partnership or corporation shall transact insurance with or for a county mutual insurer as an agent, broker or solicitor, or receive any commission from a county mutual insurer.

The secretary or other person who passes upon the risks and upon whose decisions or recommendations the application for insurance is accepted or rejected by the insurer, shall not receive, as any part of his compensation, a commission upon the premiums. His compensation shall be determined by the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

5091.

Any member of such insurer may commence to withdraw therefrom by surrendering his policy for cancellation, and by giving notice in writing to the secretary at any time during the life of the policy and while the insurer continues the business for which it was organized.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5092.

The withdrawal may be completed by paying the member’s share, if any, under the terms of his policy, of all claims that exist against the insurer on the day of such completion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.

The insurer may cancel any policy by giving the insured 20 days’ written notice of cancellation with or without tender of the excess of paid premium above the pro rata premium for the expired time, which excess, if not tendered, shall be refunded on demand. Notice of cancellation shall state that the excess premium (if not tendered) will be refunded on demand. The notice may be served in person or by mail, addressed either to the member’s last post office address or, if this is not known, to the address given upon the application which is part of the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 148, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.

In case of cancellation by the insurer it shall also notify in the same manner any holder of a mortgage whose name appears, either on the signed application which is a part of the policy, or otherwise upon the policy and any party to whom loss, if any, is payable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. The Policy [6010. - 6021.]

6010.

(a) The following is adopted as the standard form of county mutual fire insurer’s policy for this state:
California Standard Form of County Fire Insurance Policy
No.

(Space for insertion of name of company or companies issuing the policy and other matter permitted to be stated at the head of the policy.)

(Space for listing amounts of insurance, rates and premiums for the basic coverages insured under the standard form of policy and for additional coverages or perils
 insured under endorsements attached.)

In consideration of the provisions and stipulations herein or added hereto, of the obligations herein and in the application, and of ____ dollars premium this company, for the term of ________ from the day of , 20____⎱at 12:01 a.m.,to the day of ,
 20____⎰standard time,at location of property involved, to an amount not exceeding ____ dollars, does accept as a member and insure ____ and legal representatives, to the extent of the actual cash value of the property at the time of loss, but not exceeding the amount which it would cost to repair or replace the property with material of like kind and quality within a reasonable time after such loss, without allowance for any increased cost of repair or reconstruction by reason of any ordinance or law regulating construction or repair, and without compensation for loss resulting from interruption of business or manufacture, nor in
 any event for more than the interest of the insured, against all LOSS BY FIRE, LIGHTNING AND BY REMOVAL FROM PREMISES ENDANGERED BY THE PERILS INSURED AGAINST IN THIS POLICY, EXCEPT AS HEREINAFTER PROVIDED, to the property described hereinafter while located or contained as described in this policy, or pro rata for five days at each proper place to which any of the property shall necessarily be removed for preservation from the perils insured against in this policy, but not elsewhere.

For a more particular description, and as forming a part of this policy, reference is had to application No.___ on file in the office of this company.

This policy is made and accepted subject to the foregoing provisions and stipulations and those hereinafter stated, which are hereby made a part of this
 policy, together with such other provisions, stipulations and agreements as may be added hereto, as provided in this policy.

The charter and bylaws of this company are to be resorted to and used to explain the rights and obligations of the parties hereto in all cases not herein otherwise specially provided for, and are hereby made a part of this policy. This policy is made and accepted upon the above expressed condition.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, this company has executed and attested these presents; but this policy shall not be valid unless countersigned by the duly authorized secretary of this company at ____.Secretary.President.Countersigned this day of , 20____. Secretary.
Concealment, fraud
This entire policy shall be void if, whether before or after a loss, the insured has willfully concealed or misrepresented any material fact or circumstance concerning this insurance or the subject thereof, or the interest of the insured therein, or in case of any fraud or false swearing by the insured relating thereto. 
Uninsurable and excepted property
This policy shall not cover accounts, bills, currency, deeds, evidences of debt, money or securities; nor, unless specifically named hereon in writing, bullion or manuscripts. 
Perils not included
This company shall not be liable for loss by fire or other perils insured against in this policy caused, directly or indirectly, by: (a) enemy attack by armed forces, including action taken by military, naval or air forces in resisting an actual or an immediately impending enemy attack; (b) invasion; (c) insurrection; (d) rebellion; (e) revolution; (f) civil war; (g) usurped power; (h) order of any civil authority except acts of destruction at the time of and for the purpose of preventing the spread of fire; provided, that such fire did not originate from any of the perils excluded by this policy; (i) neglect of the insured to use all reasonable means to save and preserve the property at and after a loss, or when the property is endangered by fire
 in neighboring premises; (j) nor shall this company be liable for loss by theft. 
Other insurance
Other insurance may be prohibited or the amount of insurance may be limited by endorsement attached hereto. 
Conditions suspending or restricting insurance
Unless otherwise provided in writing added hereto this company shall not be liable for loss occurring (a) while the hazard is increased by any means within the control or knowledge of the insured; or (b) while a described building, whether intended for occupancy by owner or tenant, is vacant or unoccupied beyond
 a
 period of 60 consecutive days; or (c) as a result of explosion or riot, unless fire ensue, and in that event for loss by fire only. 
Other perils or subjects
Any other peril to be insured against or subject of insurance to be covered in this policy shall be by endorsement in writing hereon or added hereto. 
Added provisions
The extent of the application of insurance under this policy and of the contribution to be made by this company in case of loss, and any other provision or agreement not inconsistent with the provisions of this policy, may be
 provided for in writing added hereto, but no provision may be waived except such as by the terms of this policy or by statute is subject to change. 
Waiver provisions
No permission affecting this insurance shall exist, or waiver of any provision be valid, unless granted herein or expressed in writing added hereto. No provision, stipulation or forfeiture shall be held to be waived by any requirement or proceeding on the part of this company relating to appraisal or to any examination provided for herein. 
Cancellation of policy
This policy may be
 canceled and the insured as a member of this company may withdraw therefrom by the insured surrendering the policy for cancellation at any time during the life of the policy and while the company continues the business for which it was organized, by giving notice in writing to the company and by paying such obligations as may have accrued against the insured on the day of cancellation. This policy may be canceled at any time by this company by giving to the insured 20 days’ written notice of cancellation with or without tender of the excess of paid premium above the pro rata premium for the expired time, which excess, if not tendered, shall be refunded on demand. Notice of cancellation shall state that said excess premium (if not tendered) will be refunded on demand. If the reason for cancellation is nonpayment of premium, this policy may be canceled by this company by giving to the insured a 10 days’
 written notice of cancellation. 
Assignment
This company may give its consent in writing allowing the assignment of this policy upon the bona fide sale of the property insured herein; provided, within 30 days from the transfer of the title to the within property and upon the assignment thereof such purchaser or his or her agent signs an agreement becoming a member and accepting the conditions of the within policy; otherwise this policy to be null and void, except as to holders of a mortgage or deed of trust. 
Mortgagee interests and obligations
If
 loss hereunder is made payable, in whole or in part, to a designated mortgagee not named herein as the insured, such interest in this policy may be canceled by giving to such mortgagee a 10 days’ written notice of cancellation.

If the insured fails to render proof of loss such mortgagee, upon notice, shall render proof of loss in the form herein specified within 60 days thereafter and shall be subject to the provisions hereof relating to appraisal and time of payment and of bringing suit. If this company shall claim that no liability existed as to the mortgagor or owner, it shall, to the extent of payment of loss to the mortgagee, be subrogated to all the mortgagee’s rights of recovery, but without impairing mortgagee’s right to sue; or it may pay off the mortgage debt and require an assignment thereof and of the mortgage. Other provisions relating to the
 interests and obligations of such mortgagee may be added hereto by agreement in writing. 
Pro rata liability
This company shall not be liable for a greater proportion of any loss than the amount hereby insured shall bear to the whole insurance covering the property against the peril involved, whether collectible or not. 
Requirements in case loss occurs
The insured shall give written notice to this company of any loss without unnecessary delay, protect the property from further damage, forthwith separate the damaged and undamaged personal property,
 put it in the best possible order, furnish a complete inventory of the destroyed, damaged and undamaged property, showing in detail quantities, costs, actual cash value and amount of loss claimed; and within 60 days after the loss, unless such time is extended in writing by this company, the insured shall render to this company a proof of loss, signed and sworn to by the insured, stating the knowledge and belief of the insured as to the following: The time and origin of the loss, the interest of the insured and of all others in the property, the actual cash value of each item thereof and the amount of loss thereto, all encumbrances thereon, all other contracts of insurance, whether valid or not, covering any of said property, any changes in the title, use, occupation, location, possession or exposures of said property since the issuing of this policy, by whom and for what purpose any building herein described
 and the several parts thereof were occupied at the time of loss and whether or not it then stood on leased ground, and shall furnish a copy of all the descriptions and schedules in all policies and, if required and obtainable, verified plans and specifications of any building, fixtures or machinery destroyed or damaged. The
 insured, as often as may be reasonably required, shall exhibit to any person designated by this company all that remains of any property herein described, and submit to examinations under oath by any person named by this company, and subscribe the same; and, as often as may be reasonably required, shall produce for examination all books of account, bills, invoices and other vouchers, or certified copies thereof if originals be lost, at such reasonable time and place as may be designated by this company or its representative, and shall permit extracts and copies thereof to be made.
Appraisal
In case the insured and this company shall fail to agree as to the actual cash value or the amount of loss, then, on the written
 demand of either, each shall select a competent and disinterested appraiser and notify the other of the appraiser selected within 20 days of such demand. The appraisers shall first select a competent and disinterested umpire; and failing for 15 days to agree upon such umpire, then, on request of the insured or this company, such umpire shall be selected by a judge of a court of record in the state in which the property covered is located. The appraisers shall then appraise the loss, stating separately actual cash value and loss to each item; and, failing to agree, shall submit their differences, only, to the umpire. An award in writing, so itemized, of any two when filed with this company shall determine the amount of actual cash value and loss. Each appraiser shall be paid by the party selecting him or her and the expenses of appraisal and umpire shall be paid by the parties equally. 
Company’s options
It shall be optional with this company to take all, or any part, of the property at the agreed or appraised value, and also to repair, rebuild or replace the property destroyed or damaged with other of like kind and quality within a reasonable time, on giving notice of its intention so to do within 30 days after the receipt of the proof of loss herein required. 
Abandonment
There can be no abandonment to this company of any property. 
When loss payable
Except where assessment is required as hereinafter provided, the amount of loss for which this company may be liable shall be payable 60 days after proof of loss, as herein provided, is received by this company and ascertainment of the loss is made either by
 agreement between the insured and this company expressed in writing or by the filing with this company of an award as herein provided. 
Assessment for deficiency
When the amount of any loss shall have been ascertained, which exceeds in amount the cash funds of the company, the president shall convene the directors of this company, who shall proceed in the manner provided by Article 8 (commencing with Section 7010) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Insurance
 Code.
Notice of assessment
It shall be the duty of the secretary, whenever assessment shall have been made, to immediately notify every person holding a risk in this company, personally, by an agent, or by letter directed to the person’s usual post office address, of the amount of such loss, and the sum due from him or her, as his or her share thereof, and of the time and to whom such payment is made; but such time shall not be less than 30 days, nor more than 90 days from date of such notice. No assessment or assessments can be levied under this policy in excess of three times the premium named herein. 
Action
 for neglect or refusal to pay assessments
An action may be brought against the member whose property is insured herein and this policy is automatically suspended if the insured shall not have paid, before it is delinquent, the insured’s portion of any assessment levied or other liability due this company for a period in excess of 90 days. The directors of this company who shall willfully refuse or neglect to perform the duties imposed upon them by law or the bylaws of the company, shall be liable in their individual capacity to the person sustaining such loss. An action may also be brought and maintained against this company by members thereof for losses sustained if payment is withheld after the amount of such losses have been determined and is due by the terms of the policy. 
Suit
No suit or action on this policy for the recovery of any claim shall be sustainable in any court of law or equity unless all the requirements of this policy shall have been complied with, and unless commenced within 12 months next after inception of the loss. If the loss is related to a state of emergency, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 8558 of the Government Code, the time limit to bring suit is extended to 24 months after inception of the loss.
Subrogation
This company may require from the insured an assignment of all right of recovery against any party for loss to the
 extent that payment therefor is made by this company.
(b) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall govern a policy utilizing the form provided in subdivision (a) when that policy is originated or renewed on or after January 1, 2004.

(c) (1) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision govern a policy originated or renewed on or after the effective date of this act.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an insurer shall incorporate the revisions to the standard form of county mutual fire insurer’s policy made by the act adding this subdivision on or before July 1, 2019.
